Oklahoma, session 2026, SB140.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
Of the funds appropriated in Section 8 of Enrolled House Bill
No. 2766 of the 1st Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, One
Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) shall be expended for the purpose of
implementing the Oklahoma Math Achievement and Proficiency Act.
ENR. S. B. NO. 140 Page 3

SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1210.900 of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Sections 2 through 8 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the “Oklahoma Math Achievement and Proficiency Act”.
B. The Legislature finds that it is essential for children
enrolled in the public schools in this state to develop strong
mathematical proficiency early and consistently. The Legislature
further finds that clear and visible goals, assessments to determine
math proficiency at each school, the use of scientifically based and
researched methodologies in math instruction, along with regular and
periodic measurements of school math improvement, and accountability
at each level of the educational system will result in a significant
increase in the number of children performing at or above grade
level in mathematics.
C. The purpose of the Oklahoma Math Achievement and Proficiency
Act is to ensure that student achievement in math is encouraged and
progression from one grade to another is determined, in part, upon
proficiency in mathematics, that school district board of education
policies facilitate promotion of advanced math instruction and
intervention services to address student math needs, and that each
student and his or her parent or legal guardian be informed of the
student’s progress in mathematics.
D. Each public school district in this state shall ensure that
all students receive a well-rounded education focused on building
deep foundations in mathematics, reading, and writing. The State
Board of Education shall encourage school districts to integrate the
teaching of the other curricular areas in subject matter standards
adopted by the Board with the instruction of mathematics, reading,
and writing.
E. All teachers of mathematics in the public schools in this
state shall incorporate into instruction the foundational elements
of math instruction, including the development of grade-level
appropriate mathematical proficiency which is a combination of real-
world problem-solving skills, procedural fluency, conceptual
understanding, and productive dispositions.
ENR. S. B. NO. 140 Page 4

SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1210.901 of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. To identify students who have a math deficiency including
students with characteristics of dyscalculia, each student enrolled
in second, third, fourth, and fifth grade in a public school in this
state shall be screened at the beginning, middle, and end of each
school year for math proficiency including, but not limited to,
real-world problem-solving skills, procedural fluency, conceptual
understanding, and productive dispositions. A screening instrument
approved by the State Board of Education shall be utilized for the
purposes of this section. In determining which screening instrument
to approve, the State Board of Education shall take into
consideration, at a minimum, the following factors:
1. The time required to conduct the screening instrument with
the intention of minimizing the impact on instructional time;
2. The timeliness in reporting screening instrument results to
teachers, administrators, and parents or legal guardians of
students; and
3. The integration of the screening instrument into the math
curriculum.
B. Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year, the State Board of
Education shall approve a list of screening instruments for use at
the beginning, middle, and end of the school year for monitoring
progress and measurement of math proficiency as required in
subsection A of this section. The screening instrument shall:
1. Assess mathematical proficiency, which is a combination of
real-world problem-solving skills, procedural fluency, conceptual
understanding, and productive dispositions for the grade level as
defined by the state’s subject matter standards;
2. Document the validity and reliability of each assessment;
3. Be used for identifying students who are at risk for math
deficiencies and for progress monitoring throughout the school year;
ENR. S. B. NO. 140 Page 5

4. Be used to assess students with disabilities and English
language learners; and
5. Be accompanied by a data management system that provides
profiles of students, class, grade level, and school building. The
profiles shall identify each student’s instructional point of need,
competency for advanced math coursework, and math proficiency level.
The State Board of Education shall also determine other comparable
math assessments for diagnostic purposes to be used for students at
risk of math failure.
C. 1. Exemptions to the screening requirements required by
this section may be provided to students who have documented
evidence that they meet at least one of the following criteria as
related to the provision of classroom instruction:
a. the student participates in the Oklahoma Alternate
Assessment Program (OAAP) and is taught using
alternate methods,
b. the student’s primary expressive or receptive
communication is sign language,
c. the student’s primary form of written or read text is
Braille, or
d. the student’s primary expressive or receptive language
is not English, the student is identified as an
English learner using a state-approved identification
assessment, and the student has had less than one (1)
school year of instruction in an English-learner
program.
2. A public school that grants an exemption pursuant to
paragraph 1 of this subsection shall provide ongoing evidence of
student progression toward English language acquisition with the
same frequency as administration of screening assessments. Evidence
may include, but not be limited to, student progression toward OAAP
math essential elements, proficiency in sign language and
mathematical reasoning, and proficiency in Braille and mathematical
concepts.
ENR. S. B. NO. 140 Page 6

D. 1. Students who are administered a screening instrument
pursuant to subsection A of this section and are found to be
exceeding grade-level targets shall be provided advanced learning
opportunities in mathematics approved for that student’s grade
level. No student who qualifies pursuant to this subsection shall
be removed from the advanced learning opportunity provided to the
student unless a parent or legal guardian of the student provides
written consent for the student to be excluded or removed after
being adequately informed that the student’s placement was
determined by the student’s achievement on the screening instrument.
2. Students who are administered a screening instrument
pursuant to subsection A of this section and are found not to be
meeting grade-level targets shall be provided a program of math
instruction designed to enable students to acquire the appropriate
grade-level math proficiency. The program of math instruction shall
be based on scientific math research and align with the subject
matter standards adopted by the State Board of Education. A program
of math instruction shall include:
a. sufficient additional in-school instructional time for
the acquisition of mathematical proficiency, which is
a combination of real-world problem-solving skills,
procedural fluency, conceptual understanding, and
productive dispositions,
b. if necessary and if funding is available, tutorial
instruction after regular school hours, on Saturdays,
and during summer; however, such instruction may not
be counted toward the one-hundred-eighty-day or one-
thousand-eighty-hour school year required in Section
1-109 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes,
c. assessments identified for diagnostic purposes and
periodic monitoring to measure the acquisition of math
proficiency including, but not limited to, real-world
problem-solving skills, procedural fluency, conceptual
understanding, and productive dispositions, as
identified in the student’s program of math
instruction,
ENR. S. B. NO. 140 Page 7

d. high-quality instructional materials grounded in
scientifically based math research, and
e. a means of providing every family of a student in
second, third, fourth, and fifth grade access to free
online evidence-based math instruction resources to
support the student’s math development at home.
3. A student enrolled in second, third, fourth, and fifth grade
who exhibits a deficiency in math at any time based on the screening
instrument administered pursuant to subsection A of this section
shall receive an individual math intervention plan no later than
thirty (30) days after the identification of the deficiency in math.
The math intervention plan shall be provided in addition to core
math instruction that is provided to all students. The math
intervention plan shall:
a. describe the research-based math intervention services
the student will receive to remedy the deficiency in
math,
b. provide explicit and systematic instruction in real-
world problem-solving skills, procedural fluency,
conceptual understanding, and productive dispositions,
as applicable,
c. monitor the math progress of each student’s math
proficiency throughout the school year and adjust
instruction according to the student’s needs, and
d. continue until the student is determined to be meeting
grade-level targets in math based on screening
instruments administered pursuant to subsection A of
this section or assessments identified for diagnostic
purposes and periodic monitoring pursuant to
subparagraph c of paragraph 2 of this subsection.
4. The math intervention plan for each student identified with
a deficiency in math shall be developed by a student math
proficiency team and shall include supplemental instructional
services and supports. Each team shall be comprised of:
ENR. S. B. NO. 140 Page 8

a. the parent or legal guardian of the student,
b. the teacher assigned to the student who had
responsibility for math instruction in that academic
year,
c. a teacher who is responsible for math instruction and
is assigned to teach in the next grade level of the
student, and
d. a teacher who specializes in math interventions, if
one is available.
5. A school district shall notify the parent or legal guardian
of any student in second, third, fourth, and fifth grade who
exhibits a deficiency in math at any time based on the screening
instrument administered pursuant to subsection A of this section.
The notification shall occur no later than thirty (30) days after
the identification of the deficiency in math.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1210.902 of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Contingent on the provision of appropriated funds designated
for the Oklahoma Math Achievement and Proficiency Act, public school
districts may be allocated monies for each enrolled second-, third-,
fourth-, and fifth-grade student of the current school year who is
found to be in need of remediation or intensive intervention
services in mathematics. The allocation shall be distributed to
each public school district upon approval of the strong math plan
for the school district by the State Board of Education and the
submittal of a child-count report to the State Department of
Education that details the number of students identified as needing
remediation or intensive intervention services in mathematics. To
determine a per-student allocation amount, the total amount of funds
available for allocation each year shall be divided by the total
number of students in the state identified as in need of remediation
or intensive intervention services in mathematics as provided for in
Section 3 of this act. Each public school district shall be
allocated an amount equal to the per-student allocation amount
ENR. S. B. NO. 140 Page 9

multiplied by the number of identified students enrolled in the
school district.
B. Public school districts receiving more than Two Thousand
Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) pursuant to subsection A of this
section shall spend no less than ten percent (10%) to provide
professional development for teachers. The professional development
shall include training in scientifically based math research
including how students learn mathematical concepts; training in
providing explicit and systematic instruction in real-world problem-
solving skills, procedural fluency, conceptual understanding, and
productive dispositions; implementing math strategies that research
has shown to be successful in improving math proficiency among
students with math difficulties; courses leading to a micro-
credential in mathematics; and instructional materials required for
implementation.
C. The State Department of Education shall approve and publish
a list of professional development programs that are evidence-based
and directly address the cognitive science of how students learn
mathematics for which districts are permitted to use the funds
received pursuant to this section.
D. If a teacher attends and completes a professional
development institute in elementary math approved by the Commission
for Educational Quality and Accountability during the summer or when
school is not in session, the teacher may receive a stipend equal to
the amount of the cost for a substitute teacher, based on the amount
of funds allocated.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1210.903 of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. If a teacher determines that a student in second, third,
fourth, and fifth grade is performing above grade level in
mathematics by the start of the second quarter of the school year,
the parent or legal guardian of the student shall be notified of:
1. The math proficiency level of the student;
ENR. S. B. NO. 140 Page 10

2. The program of advanced math instruction available for the
student; and
3. The potential for the student to participate in a summer
academy or other program designed to assist the student in excelling
in mathematics.
B. If a teacher determines that a student in second, third,
fourth, and fifth grade is not performing at grade level in
mathematics by the start of the second quarter of the school year,
the parent or legal guardian of the student shall be notified of:
1. The math proficiency level of the student;
2. The program of math instruction for the student as required
pursuant to this act; and
3. The potential need for the student to participate in a
summer academy or other program designed to assist the student in
attaining grade-level math proficiency.
C. A teacher who determines a student in second, third, fourth,
and fifth grade is exceeding or not meeting grade-level targets for
mathematics may, after consultation with the parent or legal
guardian of the student, recommend that the student participate in
and complete a summer academy or other program.
D. Summer academy programs shall be designed to ensure that
participating students successfully complete an advanced
mathematical program or grade-level competencies in mathematics to
enhance next-grade readiness. A summer academy math program shall
be a program that incorporates the content of a scientifically
research-based professional development program administered by the
Commission for Educational Quality and Accountability or a
scientifically research-based math program administered by the State
Board of Education which is taught by teachers who have successfully
completed professional development in the math program. All summer
academy programs shall consist of a minimum of three (3) consecutive
days. The State Department of Education shall provide a list of
qualified entities for providing the summer academy programs to all
schools by April 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 140 Page 11

E. School districts may approve an option for students who are
unable to attend a summer academy. The optional program may
include, but not be limited to, an approved private provider of
instruction, approved computer- or Internet-based instruction, or an
approved program of math instruction monitored by the parent or
legal guardian of the student. Public school districts shall not be
required to pay for the optional program but shall clearly
communicate to the parent or legal guardian the expectations of the
program and any costs that may be involved.
F. Subject to the availability of funds, beginning one (1) year
after implementation of this section, the requirements of subsection
C of this section may be expanded to apply to students in first
grade. Each year thereafter, the requirements may be expanded by
one grade level until the requirements apply to kindergarten
students through fifth-grade students. Summer academy programs
shall be designed for each grade level. Nothing in this section
shall prevent the State Board of Education or a school district
board of education from utilizing private, local, or federal funds
to implement the provisions of this section.
G. The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules to
implement the provisions of this section, which shall include
requirements for instructional time for summer academy programs,
teacher qualifications, and evaluation of student achievement as a
result of summer academy programs or other optional programs.
SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1210.904 of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Commission for Educational Quality and Accountability
shall ensure that the mathematics competencies for elementary
teachers are included in the competencies for special education
teachers.
B. The Commission for Educational Quality and Accountability,
in collaboration with the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education, shall ensure that all teachers of early childhood
education, elementary education, and special education are provided
quality training in intervention, instruction, and remediation
strategies in mathematics to provide explicit and systematic
ENR. S. B. NO. 140 Page 12

instruction in real-world problem-solving skills, procedural
fluency, conceptual understanding, and productive dispositions. The
Commission, in collaboration with the State Regents, shall also
implement mathematical strategies that research has shown to be
successful in improving mathematics understanding among students
with math difficulties. In addition, quality education for
prospective teachers shall be provided in research-based
instructional strategies for teaching, assessing, and intervening in
mathematics development for all students including advanced
learners, typically developing learners, and struggling learners who
face a range of challenges including, but not limited to, English
learners and students with disabilities or learning challenges, such
as dyscalculia. Quality training shall include guidance from
professional resources such as the National Council of Teachers of
Mathematics (NCTM) guidelines, Response to Intervention guidelines,
and professional organizations such as the Council for Exceptional
Children, National Association for the Education of Young Children,
and other relevant professional mathematics education bodies.
C. All institutions of higher education within The Oklahoma
State System of Higher Education that offer elementary, early
childhood education, or special education programs approved by the
Commission for Educational Quality and Accountability shall
incorporate into those programs the requirement that teacher
candidates study key elements of mathematics instruction including
real-world problem-solving skills, procedural fluency, conceptual
understanding, and productive dispositions. Teacher candidates
shall study strategies including, but not limited to, instruction
that is explicitly taught, sequenced, multimodal (visual, auditory,
kinesthetic, etc.), interdisciplinary, and reflective to adapt for
individual learners.
D. Candidates applying for an alternative placement teaching
certificate or an emergency teaching certificate in elementary
education shall complete instruction in a scientifically research-
based math program as determined by the Commission for Educational
Quality and Accountability and the State Board of Education.
SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1210.906 of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
ENR. S. B. NO. 140 Page 13

A. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education to be
designated the “Statewide Mathematics Revolving Fund”. The fund
shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations,
and shall consist of all monies received by the State Regents from
state appropriations provided for the purpose of implementing the
provisions of subsection B of this section. All monies accruing to
the credit of the fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted
and expended by the State Regents for the purpose provided for in
this subsection. Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon
warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as
prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
B. Subject to the availability of funding, the Oklahoma State
Regents for Higher Education shall utilize the Statewide Mathematics
Revolving Fund created in subsection A of this section to:
1. Implement training for a scientifically research-based math
program in teacher education programs accredited by the Commission
for Educational Quality and Accountability. For the purposes of
this section, training in a scientifically research-based math
program includes providing explicit and systematic instruction in
real-world problem-solving skills, procedural fluency, conceptual
understanding, and productive dispositions, and implementing
instructional strategies that research has shown to be successful in
improving mathematics achievement among students with learning
difficulties in math. Beginning with students entering a teacher
education program accredited by the Commission for Educational
Quality and Accountability in the 2026-2027 academic year,
completion of training required by this paragraph shall lead to a
micro-credential in mathematics, which shall be reflected on
teaching certificates awarded to such individuals; and
2. Support teacher education programs accredited by the
Commission for Educational Quality and Accountability in developing
and implementing a micro-credential in mathematics for certified
teachers employed by school districts and charter schools in this
state. A micro-credential awarded pursuant to this paragraph shall
be reflected on a teacher’s certificate to teach.
ENR. S. B. NO. 140 Page 14

SECTION 8. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1210.907 of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year and for each school
year thereafter, any student enrolled in second, third, fourth, and
fifth grade in a public school in this state who is assessed through
the Oklahoma Math Achievement and Proficiency Act pursuant to
Section 3 of this act, and who is not meeting grade-level targets in
mathematics after the beginning-of-the-year screening instrument,
shall be screened for dyscalculia. Screening also may be requested
for a student by his or her parent or legal guardian, teacher, or
counselor. A student who is identified with characteristics of
dyscalculia shall not be required to be rescreened unless requested
by his or her parent or legal guardian.
B. No later than December 31, 2025, the State Board of
Education shall develop policies for dyscalculia screening required
pursuant to this section and shall include, but not be limited to:
1. The definition and characteristics of dyscalculia and
related disorders;
2. The process for referring students in grades two through
five for screening;
3. A process for providing notification to parents or legal
guardians of the use of a qualified dyscalculia-screening tool and
notification of the results of the screening;
4. A process for providing the parents or legal guardians of
students screened for dyscalculia with information and resource
material regarding dyscalculia;
5. A process for monitoring the student’s progress after the
positive identification of characteristics of dyscalculia or other
math-related disorders; and
6. Requirements and qualifications for screeners that
demonstrate an understanding of and training to administer the
screening instrument.
ENR. S. B. NO. 140 Page 15

C. The Board shall adopt a list of approved qualified
dyscalculia screening tools that address developmentally appropriate
components.
D. Screening shall be conducted in accordance with the policies
developed by the State Board of Education pursuant to subsection B
of this section and the guidance within the dyslexia and dysgraphia
handbook developed pursuant to Section 1210.517 of Title 70 of the
Oklahoma Statutes including policies and information developed
relating to universal screening of students for characteristics of
dyscalculia.
E. Beginning June 30, 2026, and June 30 each year thereafter,
public school districts shall provide the following data to the
State Department of Education:
1. The number of students by grade level in grades two through
five who were screened for dyscalculia in a school year;
2. The number of students by grade level in grades two through
five who were newly identified as having characteristics of
dyscalculia in a school year;
3. The process or tools used to evaluate student progress;
4. The number of trained school system personnel or licensed
professionals used to administer the qualified dyscalculia screening
tool;
5. The number of students in grades two through five who were
participating in interventions within the school setting and the
number of students participating in interventions outside the school
setting; and
6. The programs used by districts for intervention within the
school setting.
F. The State Department of Education shall designate personnel
to provide technical assistance to implement the provisions of this
act.
ENR. S. B. NO. 140 Page 16

G. By December 31, 2026, and by December 31 each year
thereafter, the State Department of Education shall electronically
provide a report containing all of the data provided pursuant to
subsection E of this section to the Governor and Legislature and
make the report available on the Department’s website.
H. As funds are available, beginning with the 2026-2027 school
year, the Department shall provide training on the best practices
for screening for dyscalculia.
I. The State Board of Education may promulgate rules to
implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 9. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 6-200, as
amended by Section 2, Chapter 411, O.S.L. 2024 (70 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 6-200), is amended to read as follows:
Section 6-200. A. Subject to the availability of funds, the
State Board of Education shall have authority to develop and
administer training for residency committees and training for
professional development through professional development
institutes. Included in the professional development institute
training shall be technology training. “Professional development
institutes” shall be defined as continuing education experiences
which consist of a minimum of thirty (30) clock hours. The
institutes shall be competency-based, emphasize effective learning
practices, require collaboration among participants, and require
each participant to prepare a work product which can be utilized in
the classroom by the participant. Any state professional
development institutes administered by the Board shall be chosen
through a competitive bid process and, if funds are available,
subject to peer review. The Board, prior to offering any
professional development institute, shall promulgate rules related
to administering state professional development institutes.
B. The State Board of Education shall develop, offer, and
administer professional development institutes to train elementary
school teachers in reading education and, if funds are available,
which may include, but not be limited to, grant, foundation, or
other funds, to train middle school teachers in reading education.
Funds appropriated for this purpose shall be used for the cost of
developing, administering, and contracting for the professional
ENR. S. B. NO. 140 Page 17

development institutes. When possible, certified reading
specialists shall be included as consultants. All costs of the
institutes shall be included in the contract price, and no tuition
or registration fee shall be collected from teachers attending the
institutes. The institutes shall be offered by or through the
Commission for Educational Quality and Accountability. Working in
conjunction with the State Department of Education, the Commission
shall develop a state plan for administration of such institutes and
shall report electronically on or before November 1 of each year to
the Governor and the Legislature on the format of and participation
in the institutes. The State Department of Education shall
cooperate with and provide any information requested, including data
available through the state student record system, to the State
Board of Education as is necessary to carry out the provisions of
this section.
C. Subject to the availability of funds, the State Board of
Education shall:
1. Contract for an independent evaluation of the reading
professional development institutes. The evaluation shall determine
adherence to program requirements as provided in this section and
the program’s effectiveness in increasing teacher knowledge and
student achievement; and
2. Provide continued support of the reading professional
development institutes through ongoing teacher development at
individual school sites. Funds may be used for the cost of mentor
training, payment for substitute teachers, on-site facilitation, and
any other costs necessary to ensure improved reading by students.
D. 1. For the purpose of implementing comprehensive reading
reform and systemic change, the State Board of Education shall award
one-year grants renewable for up to two (2) additional years to
public schools that serve students in kindergarten through third
grade. The grants shall provide for:
a. a five-day initial professional development institute
in elementary school reading for teachers of
kindergarten through third grade, instructional
leaders, and principals,
ENR. S. B. NO. 140 Page 18

b. a three-day follow-up professional development
institute in elementary school reading for teachers of
kindergarten through third grade and instructional
leaders, and
c. continued support through ongoing teacher development
at school sites, including four (4) days of
professional development for principals and literacy
resource specialists and six (6) days of on-site
visits by a program consultant.
2. In order to qualify for a grant pursuant to this subsection,
the following requirements shall be met:
a. at least eighty percent (80%) of the teachers of
kindergarten through third grade at the school shall
have demonstrated support for the training program
provided pursuant to this subsection,
b. the principal shall ensure that all members of the
leadership team and all teachers of kindergarten
through third grade will participate in all phases of
the training program,
c. the school district shall ensure that any new teacher
of kindergarten through third grade or principal at
the school will participate in all phases of the
training program, and
d. the school district shall employ a literacy resource
specialist for at least two (2) years after completion
of the training provided in this subsection. One or
more districts may share a literacy resource
specialist upon approval of the Board.
3. Any school which has been determined by the State Board of
Education to be a school in need of improvement shall be given
priority for receipt of a grant. Grants to local school districts
may be awarded based on the amount of funds allocated to the State
Board of Education for the purposes of this section. Funds may be
used for payment for substitute teachers, program consultants, on-
site facilitation, and literacy resource specialists.
ENR. S. B. NO. 140 Page 19

4. For program evaluation purposes, each school awarded a grant
pursuant to this subsection shall provide to the Commission for
Educational Quality and Accountability student-level data and
results of the reading assessments administered pursuant to the
Oklahoma School Testing Program Act for the year prior to the grant
award, for each year a grant is received by the school, and for
three (3) years after completion of the program. If funds are not
sufficient to award grants to all eligible applicants, schools may
be placed on a waiting list for priority consideration for the
following year’s round of grant awards which shall be superior to
the priority given to schools as provided in paragraph 3 of this
subsection, if the school provides student data for the current year
to the Board as provided in this paragraph.
5. The professional development institutes in elementary
reading provided pursuant to this section shall incorporate the
requirements of the Strong Readers Act.
E. As additional funds become available for such purpose, the
Board shall develop and offer professional development institutes
in:
1. Mathematics for teachers in grades kindergarten through nine
which incorporate the requirements of Sections 2 through 8 of this
act;
2. The use of technology in the classroom;
3. Training of residency committee members in teacher
mentoring; and
4. Hands-on inquiry-based science for elementary teachers.
SECTION 10. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 1210.508,
as amended by Section 4 of Enrolled House Bill No. 1096 of the 1st
Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, is amended to read as
follows:
Section 1210.508. A. 1. By no later than December 31, 2016,
the State Board of Education shall adopt a statewide system of
student assessments in compliance with the Elementary and Secondary
ENR. S. B. NO. 140 Page 20

Education Act of 1965 (ESEA), as reauthorized and amended by P.L.
No. 114-95, also known as the Every Student Succeeds Act (ESSA).
2. The statewide student assessment system adopted by the Board
pursuant to this subsection shall be aligned with the Oklahoma
Academic Standards as adopted by the Board and which prepare
students for college and careers.
B. 1. The Board shall issue a request for proposals for the
selection of assessments to be administered to students in grades
three through twelve as a part of the statewide student assessment
system adopted by the Board pursuant to this section.
2. The Board shall adopt assessments from the selected
proposals that were submitted pursuant to paragraph 1 of this
subsection. The adopted assessments shall be administered by the
Board for a period that is in coordination with the six-year subject
area textbook adoption cycle unless the vendor does not fulfill the
terms of the contract or fails to comply with or violates the terms
of the contract. The Board shall administer the assessments
beginning with the 2017-2018 school year.
C. The statewide student assessment system adopted by the Board
pursuant to this section shall include assessments that:
1. Are aligned with the Oklahoma subject matter standards as
adopted by the Board;
2. Provide a measure of comparability among other states;
3. Yield both norm-referenced scores and criterion-referenced
scores;
4. Have a track record of statistical reliability and accuracy;
and
5. For assessments administered in high school, provide a
measure of future academic performance.
D. For the 2016-2017 school year, the Board shall administer
assessments in:
ENR. S. B. NO. 140 Page 21

1. English Language Arts or reading and mathematics in grades
three through eight and at least once in high school, during the
grade span of nine through twelve;
2. Science not less than once during each grade span of three
through five, six through nine, and ten through twelve; and
3. United States History not less than once during the grade
span of nine through twelve.
E. 1. Beginning with the 2017-2018 school year, the statewide
student assessment system shall include assessments in:
a. English Language Arts and mathematics in grades three
through eight and at least once in high school, during
the grade span of nine through twelve,
b. science not less than once during each grade span of
three through five, six through nine, and ten through
twelve, and
c. United States History, with an emphasis on civics, not
less than once during the grade span of nine through
twelve.
2. Beginning with the 2017-2018 school year, the statewide
student assessment system may include:
a. assessments in reading and, writing, and mathematics
in certain grades as determined by the Board, and
b. contingent upon the availability of funds, an
additional nationally recognized college- and career-
readiness assessment or assessments as recommended by
the State Department of Education which will be
administered to students in high school at no cost to
the student.
F. 1. Beginning with students entering the ninth grade in the
2017-2018 school year, each student shall take the assessment or
assessments included in the statewide student assessment system
adopted by the Board pursuant to subsection A of this section in
ENR. S. B. NO. 140 Page 22

order to graduate from a public high school with a standard diploma.
All students shall take the assessment or assessments prior to
graduation, unless otherwise exempt by law.
2. Beginning with students entering the ninth grade in the
2017-2018 school year, each student, in addition to taking the
assessment or assessments included in the statewide student
assessment system adopted by the Board pursuant to subsection A of
this section, shall meet any other high school graduation
requirements adopted by the Board pursuant to Section 5 of Enrolled
House Bill No. 3218 of the 2nd Session of the 55th Oklahoma
Legislature in order to graduate from a public high school with a
standard diploma.
3. For students who start the ninth grade prior to or during
the 2016-2017 school year, school districts shall adopt a plan that
establishes the assessment or assessments those students are
required to take in order to graduate from a public high school with
a standard diploma. The plan may also include any or all of the
other high school graduation requirements adopted by the Board
pursuant to Section 5 of Enrolled House Bill No. 3218 of the 2nd
Session of the 55th Oklahoma Legislature that those students will be
required to meet in order to graduate from a public high school with
a standard diploma.
4. The Board shall promulgate rules to ensure that students who
transfer into an Oklahoma school district from out-of-state after
the junior year of high school shall not be denied the opportunity
to be awarded a standard diploma due to differing testing
requirements.
G. In order to provide an indication of the levels of
competency attained by the student in a permanent record for
potential future employers and institutions of higher education,
school districts shall report on the high school transcript of the
student the highest-achieved score on the assessment or assessments
included in the statewide student assessment system adopted by the
Board pursuant to subsection A of this section and any business- and
industry-recognized endorsements attained.
H. Students who do not perform at a proficiency level on
assessments shall be remediated as established in the assessment
ENR. S. B. NO. 140 Page 23

requirements adopted by the Board pursuant to Section 5 of Enrolled
House Bill No. 3218 of the 2nd Session of the 55th Oklahoma
Legislature, subject to the availability of funding.
I. 1. All assessments required by this section shall measure
academic competencies in correlation with the subject matter
standards adopted by the Board pursuant to Sections 11-103.6 and 11-
103.6a of this title and referred to as the Oklahoma Academic
Standards. The State Board of Education shall evaluate the subject
matter standards to ensure the competencies reflect high standards,
are specific, well-defined, measurable, and challenging, and will
prepare elementary students for next-grade-level course work and
secondary students for postsecondary studies at institutions of
higher education or technology center schools without the need for
remediation. All subject matter standards shall reflect the goals
as set forth in Section 11-103.6 of this title and of improving the
state average of college entrance exam scores.
2. The State Department of Education shall annually evaluate
the results of the assessments. The State Board of Education shall
ensure that preliminary results for all statewide assessments are
reported to districts no later than June 20 of each year and are
presented in a manner that yields detailed, diagnostic information
for the purpose of guiding instruction and student remediation. As
improvements are made to the assessments required by this section,
the Board shall seek to increase the depth of knowledge assessed for
each subject. The State Board of Education shall seek to ensure
that data yielded from the assessments required in this section are
utilized at the school district level to inform instruction,
professional development, school improvement, and remediation for
students.
3. The Commission for Educational Quality and Accountability
shall determine the cut scores for the performance levels on all
statewide assessments. The Commission shall conduct an ongoing
review to compare the statewide assessment content and performance
descriptors with those of other states. Upon receipt of the review,
the Commission may adjust the cut scores as necessary.
4. The State Board of Education, for the purposes of conducting
reliability and validity studies, monitoring contractor adherence to
professionally accepted testing standards, and providing
ENR. S. B. NO. 140 Page 24

recommendations for testing program improvement, shall retain the
services of an established, independent agency or organization that
is nationally recognized for its technical expertise in educational
testing but is not engaged in the development of aptitude or
achievement tests for elementary or secondary level grades. These
national assessment experts shall annually conduct studies of the
reliability and validity of the statewide assessments administered
pursuant to this section. Validity studies shall include studies of
decision validity and concurrent validity.
J. 1. The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules
setting the assessment window dates for each statewide assessment so
that the assessments are administered according to recommended
testing protocols and so that the assessment results are reported
back to school districts in a timely manner. The vendor shall
provide a final electronic data file of all school site, school
district, and state results to the State Department of Education and
the Office of Educational Quality and Accountability prior to August
20 of each year. The Department shall forward the final data files
for each school district and each school site in that district to
the school district. The Board shall ensure the contract with the
vendor includes a provision that the vendor report assessment
results directly to the Office of Educational Quality and
Accountability at the same time it is reported to the Board.
2. State, district, and site level results of all assessments
required in this section shall be disaggregated by gender, race,
ethnicity, disability status, migrant status, English proficiency,
and status as economically disadvantaged, except that such
disaggregation shall not be required in a case in which the number
of students in a category is insufficient to yield statistically
reliable information or the results would reveal personally
identifiable information about an individual student. Each school
site shall notify the student’s parents or legal guardians of the
school’s performance levels in the Oklahoma School Testing Program
as reported in the Oklahoma Educational Indicators Program at the
end of each school year.
K. The State Board of Education shall be responsible for the
field-testing and validation of the statewide assessment system
required in subsection A of this section.
ENR. S. B. NO. 140 Page 25

L. The State Board of Education shall develop, administer, and
incorporate as a part of the Oklahoma School Testing Program other
assessment programs or procedures including appropriate
accommodations for the assessment of students with disabilities as
required by the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA),
20 U.S.C., Section 1400 et seq.
M. For purposes of developing and administering alternate
assessments for students with the most significant cognitive
disabilities, the State Board of Education shall not be subject to
subsections D and E of Section 11-103.6a of this title.
N. By December 15, 2026, and annually thereafter, the State
Board of Education shall electronically submit a report to the
Legislature containing data collected for the most recently
completed school year on the number and demographics of students who
were eligible for advanced mathematics courses, the number and
demographics of students who were placed in advanced mathematics
courses, the number and demographics of students placed in
mathematics intervention courses, and the number and demographics of
students not placed in advanced mathematic courses or mathematic
intervention courses. The report shall include information on the
type and format of advanced mathematic courses and the type and
format of mathematic intervention courses.
O. The State Board of Education shall provide guidance on how
to best develop programming and courses to ensure all impacted
students receive rigorous, academically appropriate instruction in
mathematics.
SECTION 11. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 12. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 140 Page 26

Passed the Senate the 28th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 28th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 140 Page 27